Connecticut, session 2026, HB05325.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 10-236b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Life-threatening physical restraint" means any physical restraint
or hold of a person that (A) restricts the flow of air into a person's lungs,
whether by chest compression or any other means, [or] (B) immobilizes
or reduces the free movement of a person's arms, legs or head while the
person is in the prone position, or (C) has been deemed life-threatening
by such person's health care provider based on such person's existing
medical conditions;
(2) "Psychopharmacologic agent" means any medication that affects
the central nervous system, influencing thinking, emotion or behavior;
(3) "Physical restraint" means any mechanical or personal restriction
that immobilizes or reduces the free movement of a person's arms, legs
or head, including, but not limited to, carrying or forcibly moving a
person from one location to another. The term does not include: (A)
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5325
Briefly holding a person in order to calm or comfort the person; (B)
restraint involving the minimum contact necessary to safely escort a
person from one area to another; (C) medical devices, including, but not
limited to, supports prescribed by a health care provider to achieve
proper body position or balance; (D) helmets or other protective gear
used to protect a person from injuries due to a fall; (E) helmets, mitts
and similar devices used to prevent self-injury when the device is (i) part
of a documented treatment plan or individualized education program
pursuant to section 10-76d, or (ii) prescribed or recommended by a
medical professional, as defined in section 38a-976, and is the least
restrictive means available to prevent such self-injury; or (F) an
exclusionary time out;
(4) "School employee" has the same meaning as provided in
subsection (b) of section 10-221o;
(5) "Seclusion" means the involuntary confinement of a student in a
room from which the student is physically prevented from leaving.
"Seclusion" does not include an exclusionary time out;
(6) "Student" means a child (A) enrolled in grades kindergarten to
twelve, inclusive, in a public school under the jurisdiction of a local or
regional board of education, (B) receiving special education and related
services in an institution or facility operating under contract with a local
or regional board of education pursuant to subsection (d) of section 10-
76d, (C) enrolled in a program or school administered by a regional
education service center established pursuant to section 10-66a, or (D)
receiving special education and related services from an approved
private special education program, but shall not include any child
receiving educational services from (i) Unified School District #2,
established pursuant to section 17a-37, or (ii) the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services; and
(7) "Exclusionary time out" means a temporary, continuously
monitored separation of a student from an ongoing activity in a non-
locked setting, for the purpose of calming such student or deescalating
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5325
such student's behavior.
Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 10-76ggg of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(f) Not later than July 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, each local and
regional board of education shall submit an annual expenditure report
to the Commissioner of Education, except any board of education that
receives a grant under this section that is less than ten thousand dollars
in any fiscal year shall not be responsible for submitting such report for
such fiscal year. Such report shall include a summary and itemization of
how grant funds received pursuant to this section were expended
during the prior fiscal year for [the direct provision of special education
and related services to students, including whether such grant was used
to hire any new special education teachers, paraeducators or behavioral
or reading specialists] special education purposes, as defined in
subsection (e) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 10-91j of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes as
amended by section 24 of public act 25-67, is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection,
any agreement entered into or amended on or after July 1, 2018, but
prior to June 30, 2019, or any contract entered into or amended on or
after July 1, 2019, pursuant to section 10-76d, between a local or regional
board of education and a private provider of special education services,
as defined in section 10-91g, shall include an explanation of how the
tuition or costs for services provided under the agreement or contract
are to be calculated. Any such agreement or contract may include the
following provisions: (A) A requirement that such private provider of
special education services submit monthly or quarterly reports to such
board regarding the specific services and frequency of such services
being provided by such private provider of special education services
to students under the agreement or contract, and (B) authorization for
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5325
such board to (i) review and reconcile such reports to the contracted
services described in the agreement or contract, or (ii) conduct periodic
site visits at the location where such private provider of special
education services provides services.
(2) Any contract entered into or amended on or after July 1, 2026,
pursuant to section 10-76d, between a local or regional board of
education and a private provider of special education services that is
subject to the provisions of section 10-76aaa, shall be in accordance with
the rates or the rate schedule, as the case may be, established pursuant
to section 10-76aaa.
(b) On and after July 1, 2026, a local or regional board of education
shall not be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to subsection (b) of
section 10-76g for any costs of special education paid by such board of
education to a private provider of special education services unless such
board of education has entered into a written contract with such private
provider of special education services for the provision of such special
education services. The individualized education program of a child
shall not be considered a contract between a local or regional board of
100 education and a private provider of special education services for
101 purposes of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
102 to limit or interrupt the provision of special education and related
103 services to a child by a local or regional board of education or private
104 provider of special education services.
105 (c) Any written contract entered into or amended on or after July 1,
106 2025, between a local or regional board of education and a private
107 provider of special education services shall include a provision that
108 requires such private provider of special education services to submit a
109 base tuition and cost for services for each school year in which services
110 are to be provided pursuant to such contract to such local or regional
111 board of education not later than December thirty-first preceding the
112 school year in which services are to be provided.
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5325
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-236b(a)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-76ggg(f)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-91j
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5